Utah statutes.
39-6-103.   Perjury.

A person subject to this chapter who, in a civil judicial proceeding or in a judicial proceeding conducted by the National Guard, willfully gives, upon a lawful oath or in any form allowed by law as a substitute for an oath, any false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry is guilty of perjury and shall be punished as a military court directs.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

